Tennessee, session 114, HB0918.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-2-104, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
( ) The executive director, or the executive director's designee, shall, upon
request, issue a temporary hunting license at no cost to a veteran with any percentage
of service-connected disability for the limited purpose of participating in a hunting
experience that is sponsored and paid for by a not-for-profit organization. A temporary
hunting license issued pursuant to this subsection ( ) must be for a duration that is no
longer than the duration of the hunting experience for which the license is issued, but in
no event may the license be valid for more than seven (7) days. The executive director,
or the executive director's designee, shall accept as evidence of service-connected
disability for the purposes of this subsection ( ) a certification from the veterans'
administration.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0918
001569
- 1 -